New York, session 2025-2026, A10134.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 138 of the public service law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. ORES shall promptly publish and regularly update on its website any 4 application for a permit to site a major renewable energy facility 5 pursuant to this section, along with supporting documentation and any 6 responsive documents by ORES or other interested parties. Prior to post- 7 ing but within ten days of receiving such application and supporting and 8 responsive documents, ORES shall review any claim that the application 9 or document is exempt from disclosure under subdivision two of section 10 eighty-seven of the public officers law. Such application or document 11 may only be redacted to the minimum extent necessary to comply with the 12 requirements of the freedom of information law or to keep confidential 13 the location of threatened or endangered species or other sensitive 14 environmental information that could prove harmful if disclosed to the 15 public. Any claim by an applicant that the disclosure of specific infor- 16 mation would violate paragraph (d) of subdivision two of section eight- 17 y-seven of the public officers law shall be examined by ORES to deter- 18 mine if there is a particularized and specific justification for the 19 redaction of such information from the public record. Such information 20 shall only be redacted from the public record if ORES is satisfied that 21 the disclosure of a particular item of information would cause substan- 22 tial injury to the competitive position of the subject enterprise. 23 § 2. Section 139 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 24 subdivision 7 to read as follows: 25 7. ORES shall promptly publish and regularly update on its website any 26 application for a permit to site a major electric transmission facility EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14672-01-6 A. 10134 2 1 pursuant to this section, along with supporting documentation and any 2 responsive documents by ORES or other interested parties. Prior to post- 3 ing but within ten days of receiving such application and supporting and 4 responsive documents, ORES shall review any claim that the application 5 or document is exempt from disclosure under subdivision two of section 6 eighty-seven of the public officers law. Such application or document 7 may only be redacted to the minimum extent necessary to comply with the 8 requirements of the freedom of information law or to keep confidential 9 the location of threatened or endangered species or other sensitive 10 environmental information that could prove harmful if disclosed to the 11 public. Any claim by an applicant that the disclosure of specific infor- 12 mation would violate paragraph (d) of subdivision two of section eight- 13 y-seven of the public officers law shall be examined by ORES to deter- 14 mine if there is a particularized and specific justification for the 15 redaction of such information from the public record. Such information 16 shall only be redacted from the public record if ORES is satisfied that 17 the disclosure of a particular item of information would cause substan- 18 tial injury to the competitive position of the subject enterprise. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 20 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to section 138 21 of the public service law made by section one of this act and section 22 139 of such law made by section two of this act shall not affect the 23 expiration and repeal of such sections and shall be deemed repealed 24 therewith.